Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.420

Damages precluded.

No state court shall allow the recovery of damages from administrative action taken or for stop sales or seizures under RCW 15.49.410 if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

[ 1969 c 63 s 42.]